Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5971.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-48.3-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-48.3 entitled "Rhode
Island New Qualified Jobs Incentive Act 2015" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-48.3-7. Documentation.
(a) A business shall submit documentation: (1) Indicating indicating that it has met the
employment requirements specified in the incentive agreement for certification of its tax credit
amount within three (3) years following the date of approval of its application by the commerce
corporation; or (2) Waiving tax credits for the first year of its eligibility under the program created
by this chapter.
The commerce corporation, after a finding of good cause, may grant two (2) six (6) month
extensions of this deadline. In no event shall the incentive effective date occur later than four (4)
years following the date of approval of an application by the commerce corporation.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, any business that was awarded tax credits under this chapter
between October 1, 2018, and December 31, 2023, shall have up to and including December 31,
2025, to submit the documentation required under this section so long as such documentation also
includes evidence of withholdings required under this chapter.
(b) Full-time employment for an accounting or privilege period shall be determined as the
average of the monthly full-time employment for the period.
(c) In conducting its annual review of a business, the commerce corporation may require a

business to submit any information determined by the commerce corporation to be necessary and
relevant to its review.
(d) The credit amount for any tax period for which the documentation of a business’s credit
amount remains uncertified as of a date one year after the closing date of that period shall be
forfeited, although credit amounts for the remainder of the years of the eligibility period shall
remain available to the business.
(e) A business that was approved for tax credits under the program by the board of directors
of the commerce corporation and was unable to meet its employment commitments as determined
by the commerce corporation and did not receive any tax credits under the program, may submit a
new application for tax credits to the commerce corporation.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002092
========
LC002092 - Page 2 of 3